California, session 20252026, AB2322.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 13383.4 is added to the Water Code, to read:13383.4. For purposes of issuing permits for the discharge of stormwater from municipal separate storm sewer systems (MS4s), “commercial, industrial, or institutional site” or “CII site” shall mean a privately owned parcel or contiguous parcels of land that are commercial, industrial, or institutional based on the appropriate county tax assessor land use codes. For parcels with mixed use commercial and residential land use codes, a “CII site” shall mean the commercial, institutional, or industrial portion of the mixed land use parcel. “CII site” shall not include residential facilities of any type, including those located within a parcel assigned the land use category of mixed use.SECTION 1.Section 1342 of the Water Code is amended to read:1342.If a hearing is held on an unprotested application, notice of hearing shall be given by mailing notice not less than 15 days before the date of hearing.